Mississippi, session 2026, HB1092.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 29, Chapter 102, Laws of 2021, as amended by Chapter 51, Laws of 2022, is amended as follows: Section 29.  Of the funds appropriated under the provisions of Section 2, Ninety-seven Million Five Hundred Sixty-eight Thousand Eight Hundred Dollars ($97,568,800.00) or so much thereof, shall be derived out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the Capital Expense Fund, as created in Section 27-103-303, Mississippi Code of 1972, and allocated in a manner as determined by the Treasurer.  These funds are provided for such purposes as follows: (a)  To assist the Office of the District Attorney in the 12th Circuit Court District in paying the costs associated with the 12th Circuit Community Service Inmate Program............................ $   125,000.00 (b)  To assist the City of Heidelberg in paying the costs associated with repairs to Magnolia Street and East Poplar Street $ 100,000.00 (c)  To assist Marshall County in paying the costs associated with improvements to Barringer Road................ $ 1,200,000.00 (d)  To assist the City of Byram in paying the costs associated with Flood Control Project........................ $   400,000.00 (e)  To assist Hinds County in paying the costs associated with the District Attorney's Office.................... $ 150,000.00 (f)  To assist the Lee County 4th District Community Development Group, a nonprofit corporation, in paying the costs associated with the construction/improvements to its Community Center $   300,000.00 (g)  To assist the Windows of Amory, a nonprofit corporation, for expenses related to improvements and operations of the First Christian Church in Amory, Mississippi, known as "The Windows".. $ 200,000.00 (h)  To assist the City of Hazlehurst in paying the costs associated with Reflective Signs.................. $    75,000.00 (i)  Funding is provided to Rankin County for the purpose of advancing implementation of its comprehensive stormwater management program, including, but not limited to, activities in connection with Section 51-29-1 et seq., Mississippi Code of 1972, and for related purposes......................................... $ 2,000,000.00 (j)  To assist the City of Winona in paying the costs associated with the construction and replacement of historic clock tower................................................. $ 100,000.00 (k)  To assist the Town of Leakesville in paying the costs associated with infrastructure upgrades............ $   500,000.00 (l)  To assist the Jackson County Economic Development Foundation for infrastructure Upgrades............. $   500,000.00 (m)  To assist the Town of Sumrall in paying the costs associated with Phase II of Sportsplex............. $   600,000.00 (n)  To assist Rankin County in paying the costs associated with improvements to Andrew Chapel Road............................................. $ 1,000,000.00 (o)  To assist the City of Brandon in paying the costs associated with its downtown revitalization project.......................................... $ 1,250,000.00 (p)  To assist the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District in paying the costs associated with Dredging by deposit into the Ross Barnett Reservoir Dredging Fund................... $   500,000.00 (q)  To assist Rankin County in paying the costs associated with improvements to Gunter Road.................. $   750,000.00 (r)  To assist the City of Picayune in paying the costs associated with construction of a new police station.......................................... $ 500,000.00 (s)  To assist the City of Vicksburg in paying the costs associated with the Levee Street Road Truck Route............................................ $ 5,000,000.00 (t)  To assist Hinds Community College in paying the costs associated with the Maritime Center................ $ 1,000,000.00 (u)  To assist the Warren County Port Commission in paying the costs associated with conducting a port study............................................ $ 325,000.00 (v)  To assist the Mississippi State University in paying the costs associated with construction/improvements of Kinesiology Building................................................. $ 5,000,000.00 (w)  To assist the City of Marks in paying the costs associated with renovations to the City Hall................. $   300,000.00 (x)  To assist the Perry County in paying the costs associated with extension of natural gas line................. $ 1,000,000.00 (y)  To assist Leflore County in paying the costs associated with the construction of an Emmett Till Monument......................................... $ 150,000.00 (z)  To assist the City of Pearl in paying the costs associated with Intermodal Connector......................... $ 2,000,000.00 (aa)  To assist the City of Forest in paying the costs associated with paving and infrastructure.......... $   300,000.00 (bb)  To assist Newton County in paying the costs associated with the paving of entrance into Mississippi State Veterans Cemetery  $ 150,000.00 (cc)  To assist the City of Hernando in paying the costs associated with a traffic light at the intersection of Highway 51 and Oak Grove Road........................................ $   250,000.00 (dd)  To assist Sandcreek Wastewater Authority in paying the costs associated with the construction of a new wastewater facility in Northeast Mississippi............................. $ 1,000,000.00 (ee)  To assist Lee County in paying the costs associated with land acquisition for the Richmond Volunteer Fire Department any remaining funds may be used for facility and ground improvements $    50,000.00 (ff)  To assist the City of Madison in paying the costs associated with construction of a road to Madison City Centre........................................... $ 500,000.00 (gg)  To assist the City of Southaven in paying the costs associated with repairs to its streets............. $   350,000.00 (hh)  To assist the City of Farmington in paying the costs associated with police station upgrades............ $   150,000.00 (ii)  To assist the City of Purvis in paying the costs associated with the construction of a new city hall............................................. $ 700,000.00 (jj)  To assist the City of Greenville in paying the costs associated with downtown park improvements......... $   500,000.00 (kk)  To assist the University of Southern Mississippi  Ocean Enterprise........................................ $ 2,500,000.00 (ll)  To assist Chickasaw County in paying the costs associated with renovations to the Houston courthouse........................................ $ 350,000.00 (mm)  To assist Lauderdale County in paying the costs associated with reconstruction of the Long Creek Reservoir Dam.............................................. $ 300,000.00 (nn)  To assist the City of Rolling Fork in paying the costs associated with Civic and Event Center improvements...................................... $ 200,000.00 (oo)  To assist the Yazoo County in paying the costs associated with the Health Department........................ $   100,000.00 (pp)  To assist the City of Pass Christian in paying the costs associated with the Pass Christian Downtown Redevelopment Initiative  $ 500,000.00 (qq)  To assist the City of Holly Springs in paying the costs associated with the repair of Cuba Street and Hill Street........................................... $ 600,000.00 (rr)  To assist the City of Magnolia in paying the costs associated with infrastructure upgrades and renovations to the community center........................................... $   250,000.00 (ss)  To assist the Department of Finance and Administration in paying the costs associated with the LeFleur's Bluff Master Plan $   100,000.00 (tt)  To assist the Town of Lula, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with park improvements................. $    75,000.00 (uu)  To assist in paying costs associated with the purchase of a fire truck for the Cairo Volunteer Fire Department in Prentiss County, Mississippi....................................... $   100,000.00 (vv)  To assist the Town of Centreville, Mississippi, for the reimbursement of the procurement and installation of a generator in fiscal years 2021 and 2022........................ $    25,000.00 (ww)  To assist the City of Scooba, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with making improvements to sports and athletic fields and related facilities in the City of Scooba..................................... $   50,000.00 (xx)  To assist the Nanih Waiya Water Association in paying costs associated with painting the association's water tank........................................ $   50,000.00 (yy)  To assist in paying costs associated with acquisition of a digital hand-printing machine for the Neshoba County Sheriff's Department........................................ $   30,000.00 (zz)  To assist in paying costs associated with construction, furnishing and equipping of the Tibbee Development Club, Inc., community center in West Point, Mississippi............................ $   50,000.00 (aaa)  To assist the Town of Mathiston, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with construction, repair, renovation, upgrades and improvements to the town's baseball park and related facilities $   50,000.00 (bbb)  To assist the VFW Post 3806 in paying costs associated with the repair and renovation of the VFW Post 3806 building in the Town of Eupora, Mississippi............................. $ 25,000.00 (ccc)  To assist the Benton County Board of Supervisors in paying costs associated with upgrades and improvements to Veterans Park in the Town of Ashland, Mississippi............................... $   50,000.00 (ddd)  To assist the City of McComb, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the purchase of a fire truck............................................. $ 250,000.00 (eee)  To be deposited into the Ross Barnett Reservoir Dredging Fund.............................................. $  200,000.00 (fff)  To assist the City of Ellisville, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the purchase of a fire truck........................................ $  150,000.00 (ggg)  To assist the Town of Blue Mountain, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the purchase of equipment for the town's fire department.................................... $   75,000.00 (hhh)  To assist the Town of Walnut, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the purchase of equipment for the town's fire department........................................ $   75,000.00 (iii)  To assist the Town of Dumas, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the purchase of equipment for the town's fire department........................................ $   50,000.00 (jjj)  To assist the Town of Falkner, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the purchase of equipment for the town's fire department........................................ $   75,000.00 (kkk)  To assist in paying costs associated with the purchase of equipment for the Gravestown Volunteer Fire Department in Tippah County, Mississippi................................ $   25,000.00 (lll)  To assist in paying costs associated with the purchase of equipment for the Mitchell Volunteer Fire Department in Tippah County, Mississippi....................................... $   25,000.00 (mmm)  To assist in paying costs associated with the purchase of equipment for the Spout Springs Volunteer Fire Department in Tippah County, Mississippi................................ $   25,000.00 (nnn)  To assist in paying costs associated with the purchase of equipment for the Three Forks Volunteer Fire Department in Tippah County, Mississippi................................ $   25,000.00 (ooo)  To assist in paying costs associated with the purchase of equipment for the Dry Creek Volunteer Fire Department in Tippah County, Mississippi................................ $   25,000.00 (ppp)  To assist Ripley Main Street Association in paying costs associated with various projects................... $   50,000.00 (qqq)  To assist the Ripley Arts Council in paying costs associated with repair and renovation of and upgrades and improvements to the Dixie Theater in the City of Ripley..................................... $   25,000.00 (rrr)  To assist in paying costs associated with the purchase of a fire truck for the Wheeler Volunteer Fire Department in Prentiss County, Mississippi................................ $  100,000.00 (sss)  To assist in paying costs associated with repair and renovation of and upgrades and improvements to Mississippi Craft Center.................................................. $  100,000.00 (ttt)  To provide funds for the GRAMMY® Museum Mississippi for use as matching funds for infrastructure and infrastructure related purposes and other purposes......................................... $ 2,500,000.00 (uuu)  To assist the Town of Edwards, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the repair and renovation of and upgrades to buildings and facilities for the West Hinds Volunteer Fire Department $ 100,000.00 (vvv)  To assist in paying costs associated with repair, upkeep and maintenance of streets in the Town of Sardis.................................... $   150,000.00 (www)  To assist in paying costs associated with repair, upkeep and maintenance of streets in the Town of Como...................................... $   150,000.00 (xxx)  To the Mississippi Department of Education for use in the Emergency Assistance for Non-Public Schools (EANS)Program... $ 1,000,000.00 (yyy)  To assist the City of Jackson with capital improvements at the JH Fewell Water Treatment Plant for corrosion control, plant generator and filter replacement.................. $ 3,000,000.00 (zzz)  To assist Kipling Water Association for a running water line to provide adequate drinking water services to the presently unserved community on Fatty Leggett Road outside of Daleville, Mississippi....................................... $ 300,000.00 (aaaa)  To assist the Fannie Lou Hamer Cancer Center in Ruleville, Mississippi............................ $ 1,500,000.00 (bbbb)  For the paving of sidewalks * * *on beaches in Ocean Springs, Mississippi....................................... $ 1,000,000.00 (cccc)  For the maintenance of facilities at Long Beach High School........................................... $   500,000.00 (dddd)  For maintenance and repair of the Mary C. O'Keefe Cultural Center in Ocean Springs, Mississippi........................ $   500,000.00 (eeee)  For improvements and development of Town Commons in Gautier, Mississippi.............................. $ 1,000,000.00 (ffff)  To assist the Department of Finance and Administration with the purchase of the real property and any improvement thereon, located on Greymont Street in the City of Jackson, Mississippi, as authorized by Chapter 405, Laws of 2018, demolition of buildings and other structures on such property, necessary services, and construction of additional facilities on such property as determined by the Department of Finance and Administration and for purchasing other personal property as allowed by statute............................. $10,200,000.00 (gggg)  To assist the Brewer Community Association, Inc., for expenses related to the improvement and operation of the community center in Brewer, Mississippi............................ $   100,000.00 (hhhh)  To assist the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks in paying the costs associated with park enhancements...................................... $ 3,500,000.00 (iiii)  To assist George County and/or MDOT with the removal of the J-turn at the intersection of U.S. Highway 98 and Old Highway 63 in George County and to install a traffic light in its place $    400,000.00 (jjjj)  For repaving of the Jones County Industrial Park.................................. $    913,800.00 (kkkk)  To assist the Department of Finance and Administration in paying the costs associated with the following: (1)  Space optimization............ $  1,500,000.00 (2)  Capitol Site................. $  3,000,000.00 (3)  Ladner Building renovation.... $    250,000.00 (4)  Statewide Critical............ $  5,000,000.00 (5)  War Memorial................. $  5,000,000.00 (6)  Capitol Complex............... $  2,000,000.00 (7)  Mississippi Military Department....................................... $ 5,000,000.00 (8)  Department of Health.......... $  6,000,000.00 (9)  Mississippi School for Blind & Deaf............................................ $ 1,000,000.00 (10)  Department of Health - Local Government and Rural Water........................................... $ 3,200,000.00 (11)  Mississippi School for the Arts........................................ $  1,000,000.00 (12)  Mississippi School for Math and Science......................................... $ 1,000,000.00 (llll)  To assist with the purchase of a fire truck for the Madison County Board of Supervisors.  As a condition of receiving these funds, the fire truck shall be housed in a facility to be constructed within two (2) miles of the Amazon Fulfillment Center building on the Madison County Mega Site situated on Sections 28, 29, and 33, T9N-R2E, Madison County, Mississippi, and provide service for the Madison County Mega Site and the surrounding community........... $    750,000.00 (mmmm)  To assist the City of Canton for flood control projects................................................ $    250,000.00 (nnnn)  To assist Issaquena County Board of Supervisors with road improvements and maintenance................ $    150,000.00 SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.